Missouri, session 2026, SB1587.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.630, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 478.630,
to read as follows:
478.630. 1. There shall be two circuit judges in the
twentieth judicial circuit consisting of the counties of
Franklin, Gasconade and Osage. These judges shall sit in
divisions numbered one and two.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected
in 1980. The circuit judge in division one shall be elected
in 1982.
3. There shall be one additional associate circuit
judge in Franklin County. This associate circuit judge
shall not be included in the statutory formula for
authorizing additional associate circuit judges per county
as provided under section 478.320. The governor shall
appoint such judge, and that judge shall serve until January
1, 2029. An associate circuit judge shall be elected in
2028.
✓